Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-611
Certified nurse midwife; authorized activities.

A certified nurse midwife may, under the provisions of a practice agreement, (1) attend cases of normal childbirth, (2) provide prenatal, intrapartum, and postpartum care, (3) provide normal obstetrical and gynecological services for women, and (4) provide care for the newborn immediately following birth. The conditions under which a certified nurse midwife is required to refer cases to a collaborating licensed practitioner shall be specified in the practice agreement.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1752;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 22;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 223.